District of Columbia statutes.
1-301.113

Repealed

Corporation Counsel and Assistants may administer oaths.

Repealed.

Leg. Assem., Aug. 19, 1871, ch. 51
Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1340, ch. 854, § 932
June 30, 1902, 32 Stat. 537, ch. 1329
May 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-160, § 141(b), 57 DCR 3012
1981 Ed., § 1-363.
1973 Ed., § 1-303.